Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HUMANITIES CENTER; YOULEAD2025.new text end new text begin $68,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to Global Synergy Group, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to operate the YouLead2025 program. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end